District of Columbia statutes.
22-4404

Penalties for violation of § 22-4403.

Any person who shall violate any provision of § 22-4403 shall for each such offense be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 90 days, or both.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1336, ch. 854, § 902
Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 815, Pub. L. 85-730, § 7
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(x), 60 DCR 2064

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1703a.
1973 Ed., § 22-1703a.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $300”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(x) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.